Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2717
Limitation on scope of sections.

Sections 30-2716 to 30-2733 do not apply to (i) an account established for a partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, or other organization for a business purpose, (ii) an account controlled by one or more persons as an agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, or charitable or civic organization, or (iii) a fiduciary or trust account in which the relationship is established other than by the terms of the account.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 56.